New Jersey, session 222, A573.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  a.  Notwithstanding the provisions of any law to the contrary, the receipt from the retail sale of a used motor vehicle as defined in this section is exempt to the extent of 50% of the sales and use tax imposed under the "Sales and Use Tax Act," P.L.1966, c.30 (C.54:32B-1 et seq.) regardless of whether by private sale, casual sale or sale by a motor vehicle dealer. b.  As used in this section, used motor vehicle" means a passenger motor vehicle, motorcycle, motor home and off-road vehicle, title to, or possession of which has been transferred from the person who first acquired it from the manufacturer or dealer, and so used as to become what is commonly known as "secondhand. 2.  This act shall take effect on the first day of the second month after the date of enactment.